Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1735YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 243 Section 1. Section 815.7, subsection 9, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 9. For appointments made on or after July 1, 2024 2025 , 3 the reasonable compensation shall be calculated on the basis 4 of eighty-six one hundred twenty-six dollars per hour for 5 class âAâ felonies, eighty-one one hundred twenty-one dollars 6 per hour for class âBâ felonies, and seventy-six one hundred 7 sixteen dollars per hour for all other cases. 8